 Table of Contents UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 10-Q [X] QUARTERLY REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 For the Quarterly Period Ended September 30, 2014 or [ ] TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 For the Transition Period from to Commission file number 1-7657 AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report. Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes X No Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T ( 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files). Yes X No Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See the definitions of large accelerated filer, accelerated filer and smaller reporting company in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one): Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes No X Indicate the number of shares outstanding of each of the issuer s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date. Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY FORM 10-Q INDEX Table of Contents PART I. FINANCIAL INFORMATION °Item 1. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 1 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 2 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 3 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 4 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (Unaudited) On June 30, 2014, the Company completed a transaction to establish a non-consolidated joint venture comprising the former Global Business Travel operations of the Company. This non-cash transaction is further described within Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements. See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 5 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The Company American Express Company (the Company) is a global services company that provides customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. The Company s principal products and services are charge and credit payment card products and travel-related services offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Effective July 1, 2014, business travel-related services are offered through the non-consolidated joint venture, American Express Global Business Travel (GBT JV). Prior to July 1, 2014, the business travel operations were previously wholly owned. The Company also focuses on generating alternative sources of revenue on a global basis in areas such as online and mobile payments and fee-based services. The Company s various products and services are sold globally to diverse customer groups, including consumers, small businesses, mid-sized companies and large corporations. These products and services are sold through various channels, including direct mail, online applications, targeted direct and third-party sales forces and direct response advertising. The accompanying Consolidated Financial Statements should be read in conjunction with the financial statements incorporated by reference in the Company s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013 (the Annual Report). The interim consolidated financial information in this report has not been audited. In the opinion of management, all adjustments, which consist of normal recurring adjustments necessary for a fair statement of the interim period consolidated financial information, have been made. Results of operations reported for interim periods are not necessarily indicative of results for the entire year. The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP) requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenue and expense, and the disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities. These accounting estimates reflect the best judgment of management, but actual results could differ. Certain reclassifications of prior period amounts have been made to conform to the current period presentation. These reclassifications did not have a material impact on the Company s financial position, results of operations or cash flows. Recently Issued Accounting Standards Accounting Standards Update No. 2014-09, Revenue Recognition (Topic 606): Revenue from Contracts with Customers was issued on May 28, 2014. The guidance establishes the principles to apply to determine the amount and timing of revenue recognition, specifying the accounting for certain costs related to revenue, and requiring additional disclosures about the nature, amount, timing and uncertainty of revenues and related cash flows. The guidance supersedes most of the current revenue recognition requirements, and will be effective January 1, 2017. The Company is currently evaluating the impact this guidance, including the method of implementation, will have on its financial position, results of operations and cash flows, among other items. 6 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) On June 30, 2014, the Company completed a transaction to establish a non-consolidated joint venture, GBT JV, comprising the former Global Business Travel (GBT) operations of the Company, historically reported within the Global Commercial Services (GCS) segment, and an external cash investment. The Company has retained a 50 percent ownership interest in the GBT JV with an estimated fair value of that interest of approximately $900 million, which is accounted for as an equity method investment effective June 30, 2014, and reported in Other assets within the Consolidated Balance Sheets. In exchange for the cash contribution of $900 million paid into the GBT JV, an unrelated investor group holds the remaining 50 percent ownership interest. The investor group s cash contribution provides the primary basis for the Company s determination of the estimated fair value of its 50 percent ownership interest. As a result of the transaction, the Company deconsolidated the GBT net assets and recognized a net gain of $626 million ($409 million after tax), which was reported as a reduction to other expense for the quarter ended June 30, 2014. Prior to the deconsolidation, the carrying amount of GBT s assets and liabilities were not material to the Company s financial position. The GBT JV operates under the American Express Global Business Travel brand, pursuant to a trademark license agreement provided by the Company. The Company has also entered into a transition services agreement and certain other operating agreements with the GBT JV, pursuant to which the Company and the GBT JV provide one another with certain services and that result in related-party receivables and payables. There was no material impact to the Company during the current quarter related to the GBT JV s results of operations or the related agreements. The Company s charge and lending payment card products result in the generation of Card Member receivables and Card Member loans, respectively. For information on the Company s accounts receivable and loans and the related accounting policies, refer to Note 4 on pages 72 76 of the Annual Report. Accounts receivable by segment as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013 consisted of: 7 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Loans as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013 consisted of: Card Member Loans and Card Member Receivables Aging Generally, a Card Member account is considered past due if payment is not received within 30 days after the billing statement date. The following table presents the aging of Card Member loans and receivables as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 8 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Credit Quality Indicators for Card Member Loans and Receivables The following tables present the key credit quality indicators as of or for the nine months ended September 30: Refer to Note 5 on pages 77 78 of the Annual Report for additional indicators, including external environmental qualitative factors, management considers in its evaluation process for reserves for losses. Impaired Card Member Loans and Receivables Impaired loans and receivables are individual larger balance or homogeneous pools of smaller balance loans and receivables for which it is probable that the Company will be unable to collect all amounts due according to the original contractual terms of the Card Member agreement. For information on impaired Card Member loans and receivables and the related accounting policies, refer to Note 4 on pages 74 76 of the Annual Report. 9 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides additional information with respect to the Company s impaired Card Member loans, which are not significant for GCS, and Card Member receivables, which are not significant for ICS and GCS, as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 10 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information with respect to the Company s interest income recognized and average balances of impaired Card Member loans, which are not significant for GCS, and Card Member receivables, which are not significant for ICS and GCS, for the three and nine months ended September 30: 11 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Card Member Loans and Receivables Modified as TDRs The following table provides additional information with respect to the U.S. Card Services (USCS) Card Member loans and receivables modified as TDRs for the three and nine months ended September 30. The ICS and GCS Card Member loans and receivables modifications were not significant. For information on TDRs and the related accounting policies, refer to Note 4 on pages 74 76 of the Annual Report. 12 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, with respect to the USCS Card Member loans and receivables modified as TDRs that subsequently defaulted within 12 months of modification. A Card Member is considered to have been in default from a modification program after one and up to two consecutive missed payments, depending on the terms of the modification program. For all Card Members that defaulted from a modification program, the probability of default is factored into the reserves for Card Member loans and receivables. The defaulted ICS Card Member loan and receivable modifications were not significant. 13 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Reserves for losses relating to Card Member loans and receivables represent management s best estimate of the probable losses inherent in the Company s outstanding portfolio of loans and receivables, as of the balance sheet date. Management s evaluation process requires certain estimates and judgments. For information on the Company s reserves for losses and the related accounting policies, refer to Note 5 on pages 77 78 of the Annual Report. Changes in Card Member Receivables Reserve for Losses The following table presents changes in the Card Member receivables reserve for losses for the nine months ended September 30: Card Member Receivables Evaluated Individually and Collectively for Impairment The following table presents Card Member receivables evaluated individually and collectively for impairment and related reserves as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 14 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Changes in Card Member Loans Reserve for Losses The following table presents changes in the Card Member loans reserve for losses for the nine months ended September 30: Card Member Loans Evaluated Individually and Collectively for Impairment The following table presents Card Member loans evaluated individually and collectively for impairment and related reserves as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 15 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Investment securities include debt and equity securities that the Company classifies as available for sale. The Company s investment securities, principally debt securities, are carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets with unrealized gains (losses) recorded in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (AOCI), net of income taxes. Realized gains and losses are recognized in results of operations upon disposition of the securities using the specific identification method on a trade date basis. For information on the Company s methodology for determining the fair value of investment securities and related accounting policies, refer to Note 3 on pages 68 71 of the Annual Report. The following is a summary of investment securities as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: The following table provides information about the Company s investment securities with gross unrealized losses and the length of time that individual securities have been in a continuous unrealized loss position as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 16 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table summarizes the gross unrealized losses due to temporary impairments by ratio of fair value to amortized cost as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: The gross unrealized losses are attributed to overall wider credit spreads for state and municipal securities, wider credit spreads for specific issuers, adverse changes in market benchmark interest rates, or a combination thereof, all as compared to those prevailing when the investment securities were acquired. Overall, for the investment securities in gross unrealized loss positions (i) the Company does not currently intend to sell the investment securities, (ii) it is more likely than not that the Company will not be required to sell the investment securities before recovery of the unrealized losses, and (iii) the Company expects that the contractual principal and interest will be received on the investment securities. As a result, the Company recognized no other-than-temporary impairment during the periods presented. Supplemental Information Gross realized gains on the sales of investment securities, included in Other revenues for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 were $20 million and $100 million, respectively. Gross realized gains on the sale of investment securities, included in Other revenues for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013 were, $37 million and $102 million, respectively. There were no realized losses for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013. Contractual maturities of investment securities, excluding equity securities and other securities, as of September 30, 2014 were as follows: The expected payments on state and municipal obligations and mortgage-backed securities may not coincide with their contractual maturities because the issuers have the right to call or prepay certain obligations. 17 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The Company periodically securitizes Card Member receivables and loans arising from its card business through the transfer of those assets to securitization trusts. The trusts then issue securities to third-party investors, collateralized by the transferred assets. For information on the Company s asset securitizations and related accounting policies, refer to Note 7 on page 80 of the Annual Report. The following table provides information on the restricted cash held by the American Express Issuance Trust II (the Charge Trust) and the American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust) as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013, included in Other assets on the Company s Consolidated Balance Sheets: These amounts relate to collections of Card Member receivables and loans to be used by the trusts to fund future expenses and obligations, including interest paid on investor securities, credit losses and upcoming debt maturities. American Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc. (TRS), which is a consolidated subsidiary of the Company, is the primary beneficiary of both the trusts. Excluding its consolidated subsidiaries, TRS owns approximately $1.0 billion of subordinated securities issued by the Lending Trust as of September 30, 2014. Under the respective terms of the Charge Trust and the Lending Trust agreements, the occurrence of certain triggering events associated with the performance of the assets of each trust could result in payment of trust expenses, establishment of reserve funds, or in a worst-case scenario, early amortization of investor securities. During the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and the year ended December 31, 2013, no such triggering events occurred. 18 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) As of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013, customer deposits were categorized as interest bearing or non-interest bearing, as follows: Customer deposits by deposit type as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013 were as follows: The scheduled maturities of certificates of deposit as of September 30, 2014 were as follows: As of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013, certificates of deposit in denominations of $250,000 or more, in the aggregate, were as follows: 19 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The Company uses derivative financial instruments (derivatives) to manage exposures to various market risks. Derivatives derive their value from an underlying variable or multiple variables, including interest rate, foreign exchange, and equity index or price. These instruments enable end users to increase, reduce or alter exposure to various market risks and, for that reason, are an integral component of the Company s market risk management. The Company does not engage in derivatives for trading purposes. For information on the Company s derivative instruments and the related accounting policies, refer to Note 12 on pages 87 90 of the Annual Report. In relation to the Company s credit risk, under the terms of the derivative agreements it has with its various counterparties, the Company is not required to either immediately settle any outstanding liability balances or post collateral upon the occurrence of a specified credit risk-related event. Based on the assessment of credit risk of the Company s derivative counterparties as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013, the Company does not have derivative positions that warrant credit valuation adjustments. The Company s derivatives are carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Refer to Note 3 on pages 68 71 of the Annual Report for a description of the Company s methodology for determining the fair value of derivatives. The following table summarizes the total fair value, excluding interest accruals, of derivative assets and liabilities as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: A majority of the Company s derivative assets and liabilities as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013 are subject to master netting agreements with its derivative counterparties. In addition, the Company has no derivative amounts subject to enforceable master netting arrangements that are not offset on the Company s Consolidated Balance Sheets. 20 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Derivative Financial Instruments that Qualify for Hedge Accounting Refer to Note 12 on pages 89 90 of the Annual Report for information on derivatives that qualify for hedge accounting. Fair Value Hedges Interest Rate Contracts The Company is exposed to interest rate risk associated with its fixed-rate long-term debt. The Company uses interest rate swaps to economically convert certain fixed-rate debt obligations to floating-rate obligations at the time of issuance. As of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013, the Company hedged $18.2 billion and $14.7 billion, respectively, of its fixed-rate debt to floating-rate debt using interest rate swaps. Total Return Contract The Company hedged its exposure to changes in the fair value of its equity investment in ICBC in local currency. The Company used a total return contract (TRC) to transfer this exposure to its derivative counterparty. On July 18, 2014, the Company sold its remaining 34.3 million shares in ICBC and terminated the TRC. As of December 31, 2013, the fair value of the equity investment in ICBC was $122 million (180.7 million shares). Prior to termination, to the extent the hedge was effective, the gain or loss on the TRC offset the gain or loss on the investment in ICBC. Any difference between the changes in the fair value of the derivative and the hedged item resulted in hedge ineffectiveness and was recognized in Other expenses in the Consolidated Statements of Income. The following table summarizes the impact on the Consolidated Statements of Income associated with the Company s hedges of its fixed-rate long-term debt and its investment in ICBC for the three and nine months ended September 30: The Company also recognized a net reduction in interest expense on long-term debt of $74 million and $76 million for the three months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, and $217 million and $280 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, primarily related to the net settlements (interest accruals) on the Company s interest rate derivatives designated as fair value hedges. Net Investment Hedges The effective portion of the gain or (loss) on net investment hedges, net of taxes, recorded in AOCI as part of the cumulative translation adjustment was $246 million and $(123) million for the three months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, and was $113 million and $160 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively. Any ineffective portion of the gain or (loss) on net investment hedges is recognized in other expenses during the period of change. During the three months ended 21 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) September 30, 2014 and 2013, the Company reclassified $(1) million and nil, respectively, and $9 million and nil for the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, from AOCI to earnings as a component of other expenses. No ineffectiveness associated with net investment hedges was reclassified from AOCI into income during the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013. Derivatives Not Designated as Hedges For information on derivatives not designated as hedges, refer to Note 12 on page 90 of the Annual Report. The following table summarizes the impact on pretax earnings of derivatives not designated as hedges, as reported on the Consolidated Statements of Income for the three and nine months ended September 30: Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair Value For information about the Company s valuation techniques for financial assets and financial liabilities measured at fair value and the fair value hierarchy, refer to Note 3 on pages 68 70 of the Annual Report. Refer to Note 12 on pages 87 90 of the Annual Report for additional information about the fair value of the Company s derivative financial instruments. The following table summarizes the Company s financial assets and financial liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis, categorized by GAAP s valuation hierarchy, as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 22 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Other Than Fair Value For information about the valuation techniques used in the measurement of financial assets and financial liabilities carried at other than fair value, refer to Note 3 on pages 70 71 of the Annual Report. The following table discloses the estimated fair value for the Company s financial assets and financial liabilities that are not required to be carried at fair value on a recurring basis, as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013. The fair values of these financial instruments are estimates based upon the market conditions and perceived risks as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013, and require management judgment. These figures may not be indicative of their future fair values. The fair value of the Company cannot be reliably estimated by aggregating the amounts presented. 23 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements The Company has certain assets that are subject to measurement at fair value on a nonrecurring basis. For these assets, measurement at fair value in periods subsequent to their initial recognition is applicable if determined to be impaired. During the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and during the year ended December 31, 2013, the Company did not have any material impaired assets that were required to be measured at fair value. The Company provides Card Member protection plans that cover losses associated with purchased products, as well as certain other guarantees in the ordinary course of business. In relation to its maximum potential undiscounted future payments as shown in the table that follows, to date the Company has not experienced any significant losses related to guarantees. The Company s initial recognition of guarantees is at fair value. In addition, the Company establishes reserves when a loss is probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated. The following table provides information related to such guarantees as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: 24 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) AOCI is comprised of items that have not been recognized in earnings but may be recognized in earnings in the future when certain events occur. Changes in each component of AOCI for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013 were as follows: 25 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table presents the effects of reclassifications out of AOCI and into the Consolidated Statements of Income for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014: The Company is under continuous examination by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and tax authorities in other countries and states in which the Company has significant business operations. The tax years under examination and open for examination vary by jurisdiction. The IRS has completed its field examination of the Company s federal tax returns for years through 2007; however, refund claims for certain years continue to be reviewed by the IRS. In addition, the Company is currently under examination by the IRS for the years 2008 through 2011. The Company believes it is reasonably possible that its unrecognized tax benefits could decrease within the next 12 months by as much as $686 million principally as a result of potential resolutions of prior years tax items with various taxing authorities. The prior years tax items include unrecognized tax benefits relating to the deductibility of certain expenses or losses and the attribution of taxable income to a particular jurisdiction or jurisdictions. Of the $686 million of unrecognized tax benefits, approximately $529 million relates to amounts that if recognized would be recorded to shareholders equity and would not impact the Company s results of operations or the effective tax rate. 26 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The effective tax rate was 34.2 percent and 34.4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively. The effective tax rate was 31.8 percent and 31.4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013, respectively. The tax rate for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013 reflects the resolution of certain prior years tax items as well as the reversal of a valuation allowance related to deferred tax assets within the business travel organization. The tax rates for all periods reflect the level of pretax income in relation to recurring permanent tax benefits and geographic mix of business. The computations of basic and diluted EPS were as follows: For the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, the Company met specified performance measures related to the Subordinated Debentures of $750 million issued in 2006, and maturing in 2036. If the performance measures were not achieved in any given quarter, the Company would be required to issue common shares and apply the proceeds to make interest payments. 27 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following is a detail of Other commissions and fees: The following is a detail of Other revenues: The following is a detail of Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other: Marketing and promotion expense includes advertising costs, which are expensed in the year in which the advertising first takes place. Card Member rewards expense includes the costs of rewards programs, including Membership Rewards and co-brand arrangements. Card Member services expense includes protection plans and complimentary services provided to Card Members. 28 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following is a detail of Other, net expenses: The Company and its subsidiaries are involved in a number of legal proceedings concerning matters arising out of the conduct of their respective business activities and are periodically subject to governmental and regulatory examinations, information gathering requests, subpoenas, inquiries and investigations (collectively, governmental examinations). As of September 30, 2014, the Company and various of its subsidiaries were named as a defendant or were otherwise involved in numerous legal proceedings and governmental examinations in various jurisdictions, both in and outside the U.S. The Company discloses its material legal proceedings and governmental examinations under Item 1. Legal Proceedings in Part II. Other Information , and under Legal Proceedings in the Annual Report (collectively, Legal Proceedings). The Company has recorded liabilities for certain of its outstanding legal proceedings and governmental examinations. A liability is accrued when it is both (a) probable that a loss has occurred and (b) the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. There may be instances in which an exposure to loss exceeds the accrued liability. The Company evaluates, on a quarterly basis, developments in legal proceedings and governmental examinations that could cause an increase or decrease in the amount of the liability that has been previously accrued or a revision to the disclosed estimated range of possible losses, as applicable. The Company s legal proceedings range from cases brought by a single plaintiff to class actions with millions of putative class members. These legal proceedings, as well as governmental examinations, involve various lines of business of the Company and a variety of claims (including, but not limited to, common law tort, contract, antitrust and consumer protection claims), some of which present novel factual allegations and/or unique legal theories. While some matters pending against the Company specify the damages claimed by the plaintiff, many seek an unspecified amount of damages or are at very early stages of the legal process. Even when the amount of damages claimed against the Company are stated, the claimed amount may be exaggerated and/or unsupported. As a result, some matters have not yet progressed sufficiently through discovery and/or development of important factual information and legal issues to enable the Company to estimate a range of possible loss. 29 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Other matters have progressed sufficiently through discovery and/or development of important factual information and legal issues so that the Company is able to estimate a range of possible loss. Accordingly, for those legal proceedings and governmental examinations disclosed or referred to in Legal Proceedings where a loss is reasonably possible in future periods, whether in excess of a related accrued liability or where there is no accrued liability, and for which the Company is able to estimate a range of possible loss, the current estimated range is zero to $350 million in excess of any accrued liability related to these matters. This aggregate range represents management s estimate of possible loss with respect to these matters and is based on currently available information. This estimated range of possible loss does not represent the Company s maximum loss exposure. The legal proceedings and governmental examinations underlying the estimated range will change from time to time and actual results may vary significantly from current estimates. Based on its current knowledge, and taking into consideration its litigation-related liabilities, the Company believes it is not a party to, nor are any of its properties the subject of, any pending legal proceeding or governmental examination that would have a material adverse effect on the Company s consolidated financial condition or liquidity. However, in light of the uncertainties involved in such matters, the ultimate outcome of a particular matter could be material to the Company s operating results for a particular period depending on, among other factors, the size of the loss or liability imposed and the level of the Company s earnings for that period. 30 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The Company is a leading global payments and travel company that is principally engaged in businesses comprising four reportable operating segments: USCS, ICS, GCS and Global Network Merchant Services (GNMS). Corporate functions and certain other businesses, including the Company s Enterprise Growth Group, as well as other Company operations are included in Corporate Other. The following table presents certain selected financial information for the three and nine months ended September 30: 31 Table of Contents Business Introduction When we use the terms American Express, the Company, we, our or us, we mean American Express Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, unless we state or the context implies otherwise. We are a global services company with four reportable operating segments: U.S. Card Services (USCS), International Card Services (ICS), Global Commercial Services (GCS) and Global Network and Merchant Services (GNMS). We provide our customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. Our principal products and services are charge and credit payment card products and travel-related services offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Effective July 1, 2014, business travel-related services are offered through the non-consolidated joint venture, American Express Global Business Travel (GBT JV). Prior to July 1, 2014, the business travel operations were previously wholly owned. Our range of products and services includes: Our products and services are sold globally to diverse customer groups, including consumers, small businesses, mid-sized companies and large corporations. These products and services are sold through various channels, including direct mail, online applications, in-house and third-party sales forces and direct response advertising. We compete in the global payments industry with charge, credit and debit card networks, issuers and acquirers, as well as evolving alternative payment mechanisms, systems and products. As the payments industry continues to evolve, we face increasing competition from non-traditional players that leverage new technologies and customers existing card accounts and bank relationships to create payment or other fee-based solutions. We are transforming our existing businesses and creating new products and services for the digital marketplace as we seek to enhance our customers digital experiences and develop platforms for online and mobile commerce. Emerging technologies also provide an opportunity to deliver financial products and services that help new and existing customer segments move and manage their money, which we are pursuing through our Enterprise Growth Group (EGG). Our products and services generate the following types of revenue for the Company: 32 Table of Contents In addition to funding and operating costs associated with these types of revenue, other major expense categories are related to marketing and rewards programs that add new Card Members and promote Card Member loyalty and spending, provisions for Card Member credit losses and expenses for card-related fraud losses. Financial Targets We seek to achieve three financial targets, on average and over time: If we achieve our EPS and ROE targets, we will seek to return on average and over time approximately 50 percent of the capital we generate to shareholders as dividends or through the repurchases of common stock, which may be subject to certain regulatory restrictions as described herein. Forward-Looking Statements and Non-GAAP Measures Certain of the statements in this Form 10-Q are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Refer to the Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements section. We prepare our Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP). However, certain information included within this Form 10-Q constitute non-GAAP financial measures. Our calculations of non-GAAP financial measures may differ from the calculations of similarly titled measures by other companies. Bank Holding Company American Express Company is a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 and The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve (the Federal Reserve) is our primary federal regulator. As such, we are subject to the Federal Reserve s regulations, policies and minimum capital standards. Current Business Environment/Outlook Our results for the third quarter of 2014 reflect increased spending by Card Members, growth in average Card Member loans and continued low write-off rates, while our strong balance sheet allowed us to return a substantial amount of capital to our shareholders. 33 Table of Contents Card Member billed business increased 9 percent over the prior year, both within and outside the U.S., in line with growth rates in the second quarter, while discount revenue increased 5 percent over the prior year. The gap between billed business growth and discount revenue growth, which was wider this quarter than in recent quarters, was primarily due to accelerated growth of our GNS business and a lower discount rate, as well as higher corporate client incentives and strong growth in our cash rebate rewards products in the current year. The average discount rate of 2.49 percent for the third quarter of 2014 decreased by 3 basis points from an average rate of 2.52 percent in the third quarter of 2013. In the current quarter, the discount rate was impacted by various factors, including changes in the mix of Card Member spending by industry as well our OptBlue program, through which third-party acquirers contract directly with U.S. small merchants for American Express card acceptance. We continue to believe that OptBlue will bring incremental volumes onto our network, and provide attractive economics for our business. As indicated in prior quarters, changes in the mix of spending by location and industry, volume-related pricing discounts, strategic investments, certain pricing initiatives, competition in the market and other factors will likely result in continued erosion of the average discount rate over time. Average loans continued to grow year over year, which, along with lower funding costs, led to a 9 percent increase in net interest income. Credit write-off rates remained near historically low levels, though we expect, at some point, credit write-off rates will increase from such levels. Last year s third quarter results included revenues and expenses from our business travel operations, which were deconsolidated as a result of the previously announced joint venture transaction that closed on June 30, 2014. Total expenses decreased 5 percent from the prior year, primarily reflecting expenses related to business travel operations in the prior year. Excluding those expenses from the year ago period, adjusted expenses rose 1 percent for the third quarter of 2014. 1 Operating expenses for the quarter decreased 11 percent, primarily reflecting expenses related to business travel operations in the prior year. Excluding those expenses from the year ago period, adjusted operating expenses were flat year over year. 1 We remain committed to our goal to have operating expenses grow at an annual rate of less than 3 percent in 2014 after adjusting for the impact of the business travel joint venture transaction and items related to restructuring, transaction-related costs and a contribution to the American Express Foundation discussed in our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2014. In 2008, we entered into an operating agreement with, and made a strategic investment in, Concur Technologies. During the third quarter, SAP announced its proposed acquisition of Concur. If this proposed transaction is completed, it would result in a gain for us of approximately $700 million. Currently, Concur and SAP s public expectation is that the transaction will close in the fourth quarter of this year or the first quarter of 2015. Given this expected gain, we plan to make additional investments in business building activities and initiatives designed to improve operating efficiencies. Potential growth initiatives could include incremental customer acquisition activities across our core businesses, as well as investments to strengthen partner relationships. These investments would provide valuable flexibility to deal proactively with a global regulatory and competitive environment that is rapidly changing. 34 Table of Contents Regulation of the payments industry has increased significantly in recent years and various governments around the world have established or are proposing to establish payment system regulatory regimes. The regulatory environment has heightened the focus that all financial services firms, including us, must have on controls and processes. We expect our products and practices will be a continuing focus of our regulators. See Certain Legislative, Regulatory and Other Developments for additional information on the legislative and regulatory environment. Competition remains extremely intense across the payments business. Traditional competitors and new entrants deploy increasingly greater financial and other resources to attract customers and business partners and to develop new platforms and technologies. To remain competitive, we need to continue to demonstrate the value we deliver to merchants, customers and business partners in all aspects of our relationships. In connection with our co-brand relationships, we are focusing on those relationships that offer the best value to our Card Members while also providing appropriate returns to our business. Changes in our co-brand relationships could have a significant adverse impact on our business and results of operations in the future. The actual impact on our financial performance will depend on factors such as our ability to offer attractive propositions to Card Members, grow other sources of revenue and implement expense control initiatives, although there can be no assurance that these measures will be successful. See Part II, Item 1A. Risk Factors of our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2014 for a discussion of the risks related to competition for partner relationships. While our business is diversified by product and geography, including a range of consumer and commercial card offerings, a large international business and GNS partners around the world, the global economic environment remains challenging. In addition, our results could be adversely affected by volatility in foreign exchange rates, changes in interest rates or the failure of the U.S. Congress to renew legislation regarding our active financing income, which could increase our effective tax rate and have an adverse impact on net income in 2015 and beyond. 35 Table of Contents American Express Company Consolidated Results of Operations Refer to the Glossary of Selected Terminology for the definitions of certain key terms and related information appearing within this section. Table 1: Summary of Financial Performance Table 2: Total Revenue Net of Interest Expense Summary Total Revenues Net of Interest Expense Discount revenue increased $256 million or 5 percent and $680 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases were driven by growth in billed business of 9 percent, partially offset by a decrease in the average discount rate, faster growth in GNS billings than in overall Company billings, as we share the discount revenue we earn from merchants with our GNS issuing bank partners, and higher cash rebate rewards and corporate client incentives. Billed business increased 9 percent and 8 percent for the three and nine month periods, respectively, in both the U.S. and outside the U.S. See Tables 5, 6 and 7 for more detail on billed business performance. The average discount rate was 2.49 percent for both the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2.52 percent for both the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013. See Current Business Environment/Outlook for information on the changes in the average discount rate. Net card fees increased $22 million or 3 percent and $83 million or 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily reflecting growth in total cards-in-force. 36 Table of Contents Travel commissions and fees decreased $386 million or 79 percent and $395 million or 28 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily due to the business travel joint venture transaction, resulting in a lack of comparability between periods. Other commissions and fees increased $32 million or 5 percent and $96 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases were primarily driven by higher revenue from our Loyalty Partner business and higher delinquency fees. Other revenue decreased $8 million or 1 percent and $26 million or 2 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by the loss of revenue following the sale of our publishing business in October 2013. The decrease in the three month period was partially offset by revenues received for transitional services provided to the GBT JV, higher Loyalty Edge revenue and a net increase in gains realized upon the sales of investments in Concur Technologies and the Industrial and Commercial Bank of China (ICBC). The decrease in the nine month period was partially offset by lower Card Member reimbursements, higher Loyalty Edge revenue, revenues received for transitional services provided to the GBT JV and a net increase in gains realized upon the sales of investments in Concur Technologies and ICBC. Interest income increased $48 million or 3 percent and $127 million or 2 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases reflected higher interest on loans, driven by growth in average Card Member loans, which was partially offset by higher Card Member reimbursements. Interest expense decreased $64 million or 13 percent and $193 million or 13 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The decreases were primarily driven by lower funding costs. Table 3: Provisions for Losses Summary Provisions for Losses Charge card provision for losses increased $37 million or 23 percent and $120 million or 25 percent for the three and nine month periods ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, driven primarily by higher write-offs and a larger reserve build in the current year due to higher average Card Member receivables. Card Member loans provision for losses increased $17 million or 7 percent and decreased $28 million or 3 percent for the three and nine month periods ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increase for the three month period was driven by a lower reserve release, partially offset by lower net write-offs due to improved credit performance. The decrease in the nine month period was driven by lower net write-offs due to improved credit performance, partially offset by a lower reserve release. 37 Table of Contents Table 4: Expenses Summary Expenses Marketing and promotion expense decreased $18 million or 2 percent and increased $173 million or 8 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increase in the nine month period was driven by the reinvestment, in the second quarter, of a significant portion of the gain from the business travel joint venture transaction in growth initiatives across all segments. Card Member rewards expense increased $76 million or 5 percent for the three months ended September 30, 2014, as compared to the same period in the prior year. The increase reflected higher co-brand rewards expense of $28 million, primarily related to higher spending volumes, and an increase in Membership Rewards expense of $48 million, both of which were partially offset by a change in estimate of certain rewards-related reserves. The increase in Membership Rewards expense was primarily due to an $86 million increase related to higher new points earned, in line with higher spending volume, partially offset by a $38 million decrease in the liability related to points previously earned but not yet redeemed. The decrease was driven by slower average growth in the Ultimate Redemption Rate (URR) and favorable changes in the weighted average cost per point (WAC) assumptions as compared to the same period in the prior year. Card Member rewards expense increased $310 million or 7 percent for the nine months ended September 30, 2014, as compared to the same period in the prior year. The increase reflected higher co-brand rewards expense of $130 million, primarily related to higher spending volumes, and an increase in Membership Rewards expense of $180 million, both of which were partially offset by a change in estimate of certain rewards-related reserves. The increase in Membership Rewards expense was primarily due to a $222 million increase related to higher new points earned, in line with higher spending volume, partially offset by a $42 million decrease in the liability related to points previously earned but not yet redeemed. The decrease was driven by slower average growth in the URR and favorable changes in WAC assumptions as compared to the same period in the prior year. The Membership Rewards URR for current program participants was 95 percent (rounded up) at September 30, 2014, an increase from 94 percent (rounded down) at September 30, 2013. The increase in the URR reflected greater engagement in our Membership Rewards program. Card Member services and other expense increased $8 million or 4 percent and $40 million or 7 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by increased engagement levels and use of certain Card Member benefits. 38 Table of Contents Salaries and employee benefits expense decreased $254 million or 16 percent and $214 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily due to the business travel joint venture transaction, resulting in a lack of comparability between periods. The decrease in the nine month period was partially offset by a restructuring charge in the second quarter of 2014. Other expense decreased $95 million or 6 percent and $518 million or 11 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily due to the business travel joint venture transaction, resulting in a lack of comparability between periods. The nine month period also reflected the net gain recognized as a result of the business travel joint venture transaction in the second quarter of 2014, partially offset by a charitable contribution to the American Express Foundation and a change in the estimated value of certain investments in our Community Reinvestment Act portfolio. Income Taxes The effective tax rate was 34.2 percent and 31.8 percent for the three months ended September 30, 2014, and 2013, respectively. The effective tax rate was 34.4 percent and 31.4 percent for the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively. The tax rates in all periods primarily reflected the level of pretax income in relation to recurring permanent tax benefits and the geographic mix of business. Additionally, the effective tax rate for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013 reflected the resolution of certain prior years tax items as well as the reversal of a valuation allowance related to deferred tax assets within the business travel organization. Table 5: Selected Statistical Information 39 Table of Contents The table below summarizes selected statistics for billed business and average spend during the three months ended September 30, 2014, compared to the same period in the prior year: Table 6: Selected Statistical Information 40 Table of Contents The table below summarizes selected statistics for billed business and average spend during the nine months ended September 30, 2014, compared to the same period in the prior year: Table 7: Selected Statistical Information 41 Table of Contents Table 8: Selected Statistical Information 42 Table of Contents Table 9: Net Interest Yield on Card Member Loans 43 Table of Contents Business Segment Results For information about our reportable operating segments, refer to the Business Segment Results Overview beginning on page 25 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013. U.S. Card Services Table 10: USCS Selected Income Statement Data USCS issues a wide range of card products and services to consumers and small businesses in the U.S., and provides consumer travel services to Card Members and other consumers. Discount revenue, net card fees and Other revenues increased $164 million or 5 percent and $462 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases were primarily driven by higher discount revenue, resulting from billed business growth, partially offset by a decrease in the average discount rate and higher cash rebate rewards. Billed business increased 9 percent and 8 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily reflecting 5 percent and 4 percent increases in average spending per proprietary basic card for the three and nine month periods, respectively, and 4 percent higher cards-in-force. Interest income increased $57 million or 4 percent and $148 million or 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by higher average Card Member loans, partially offset by higher Card Member reimbursements. Interest expense decreased $20 million or 12 percent and $77 million or 14 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, due to lower funding costs. 44 Table of Contents Provisions for losses increased $31 million or 11 percent and $66 million or 7 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily due to a larger reserve release in the prior year, partially offset by the benefit of lower net write-offs for Card Member loans due to improved credit performance. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased $34 million or 2 percent and $201 million or 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily reflecting higher Card Member rewards. Card Member rewards expense increased $50 million and $185 million for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases reflected higher co-brand expense, which increased approximately $16 million and $103 million for the three and nine month periods, respectively, primarily reflecting higher spending volumes, and increased Membership Rewards expense of $34 million and $82 million for the same periods, both of which were partially offset by a change in estimate of certain rewards-related reserves. The increases in Membership Rewards expense were primarily due to higher new points earned partially offset by slower growth in the URR and favorable changes in the WAC assumptions, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses increased $22 million or 2 percent and $105 million or 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily related to higher card-related fraud losses. The nine month period also reflected a change in the estimated value of certain investments in our Community Reinvestment Act portfolio and higher restructuring charges compared to the prior year. 45 Table of Contents Table 11: USCS Selected Statistical Information 46 Table of Contents International Card Services Table 12: ICS Selected Income Statement Data ICS issues proprietary consumer and small business cards outside the U.S. and operates a coalition loyalty business in various countries. Discount revenue, net card fees and Other revenues increased $45 million or 4 percent and $156 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by Loyalty Partner-related fees, higher discount revenue and an increase in net card fees. Billed business increased 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily reflecting an increase in basic cards-in-force. Refer to Tables 6 and 7 for additional information on billed business by region. 47 Table of Contents Interest income decreased $8 million or 3 percent and $5 million or 1 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The decrease in the three month period was primarily driven by higher Card Member reimbursements and a slightly lower net interest yield. The decrease in the nine month period was primarily driven by lower average loan balances. Interest expense decreased $1 million or 1 percent and $14 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by lower funding costs. Provisions for losses increased $2 million or 2 percent and decreased $3 million or 1 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. Refer to Table 13 for the lending and charge card write-off rates for 2014 and 2013. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased $34 million or 7 percent and $177 million or 12 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases were primarily driven by higher Card Member rewards expense, reflecting higher spending volumes, and higher marketing and promotion expense, related to the reinvestment, in the second quarter, of a significant portion of the gain from the business travel joint venture transaction in growth initiatives. Card Member rewards expense in the nine month period included a charge related to enhancements in the Membership Rewards URR estimation process for certain international countries. Excluding the impact of changes in foreign exchange rates, marketing and promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expense increased 15 percent for the nine month period. 2 Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses increased $12 million or 2 percent and $78 million or 5 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increase in the three month period is primarily driven by a prior year net benefit related to the sale of real estate, partially offset by lower salary and benefits expense in the current period. The increase in the nine month period is primarily driven by a second quarter restructuring charge and a Canadian value-added tax benefit in the prior year. The effective tax rate in all periods reflected the recurring permanent tax benefit related to the segment s ongoing funding activities outside the U.S., which is allocated to ICS under our internal tax allocation process. The effective tax rate for the nine months ended September 30, 2013 also reflected the allocated share of tax benefits related to the resolution of certain prior years tax items, and an additional benefit due to the renewal by the U.S. Congress of the active financing legislation on January 2, 2013. The effective tax rate in each of the periods reflected the impact of recurring permanent tax benefits on varying levels of pretax income. 48 Table of Contents Table 13: ICS Selected Statistical Information 49 Table of Contents Global Commercial Services Table 14: GCS Selected Income Statement Data GCS offers global corporate payment services to large and mid-sized companies. The Company s business travel operations, which had been reflected in GCS, were deconsolidated effective June 30, 2014 in connection with the GBT JV transaction, discussed previously; therefore, there is a lack of comparability against periods prior to the deconsolidation. The Company s proportional share of the GBT JV s net income is now reported within other revenues. Discount revenue, net card fees and other revenues decreased $320 million or 25 percent and $249 million or 7 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The decrease is primarily due to the business travel joint venture transaction, resulting in a lack of comparability between periods, partially offset by higher discount revenue resulting from an increased level of Card Member spending. Billed business increased 8 percent and 7 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, primarily driven by a 9 percent and 7 percent increase in average spending per proprietary basic card for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively. Billed business volume increased 10 percent and 8 percent within the U.S. for the three and nine month ended periods, respectively, while billed business volume outside the U.S. increased 3 percent and 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively. Net interest expense decreased $1 million or 2 percent and $3 million or 2 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. 50 Table of Contents Provisions for losses increased $20 million or 69 percent and $37 million or 40 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by higher net write-offs. Refer to Table 15 for the charge card net loss ratio as a percentage of charge volume. Excluding the impact of changes in foreign exchange rates, provisions for losses increased 75 percent for the three month period. 3 Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased $13 million or 9 percent and $62 million or 14 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by higher rewards costs. The increase in the nine month period was also driven by the reinvestment, in the second quarter, of a significant portion of the gain from the business travel joint venture transaction in growth initiatives. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses decreased $322 million or 46 percent and $853 million or 40 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily reflecting the impact of the business travel joint venture transaction. The nine month period also reflected the net gain recognized as a result of the business travel joint venture transaction, partially offset by transaction-related costs and a restructuring charge, all of which occurred in the second quarter of 2014. The effective tax rate for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013 reflected the reversal of a valuation allowance related to deferred tax assets associated with certain of the Company s non-U.S. business travel operations, as well as the allocated share of tax benefits related to the resolution of certain prior years tax items. 51 Table of Contents Table 15: GCS Selected Statistical Information Global Network Merchant Services Table 16: GNMS Selected Income Statement Data 52 Table of Contents GNMS operates a global payments network that processes and settles proprietary and non-proprietary card transactions. GNMS acquires merchants and provides point-of-sale products, multi-channel marketing programs and capabilities, services and data, leveraging the Company s global closed-loop network. It enters into partnership agreements with third-party card issuers and acquirers to license the American Express brand and extend the reach of the global network. Discount revenue, net card fees and Other revenues increased $59 million or 5 percent and $171 million or 4 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The increases are primarily driven by higher merchant-related revenues, driven by a 9 percent and 8 percent increase in global card billed business for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, partially offset by a change in the mix of Card Member spending by industry and a decrease in the average discount rate. Net interest income increased $12 million or 17 percent and $33 million or 16 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily driven by increased revenues from our Merchant Financing business. The interest expense credit relates to internal transfer pricing and funding rates, which resulted in a net benefit for GNMS due to its merchant payables. Excluding the impact of changes in foreign exchange rates, net interest income increased 24 percent for the three month period and 23 percent for the nine month period. 4 Provisions for losses increased $11 million or 85 percent and $5 million or 9 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year, primarily reflecting higher merchant-related provision expenses. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased $1 million or 1 percent and $88 million or 16 percent for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. The nine month period was primarily driven by the reinvestment, in the second quarter, of a significant portion of the gain from the business travel joint venture transaction in growth initiatives. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses decreased $3 million or 1 percent and $2 million for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to the same periods in the prior year. 53 Table of Contents Table 17: GNMS Selected Statistical Information Corporate Other Corporate functions and certain other businesses, including our EGG and other operations, are included in Corporate Other. Corporate Other net expense decreased to $185 million and increased to $667 million for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, respectively, as compared to $210 million and $660 million for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2013, respectively. The decrease in the three month period was primarily driven by lower interest expense. The nine month period reflected a charitable contribution to the American Express Foundation combined with incremental investments in growth initiatives and a second quarter restructuring charge, partially offset by lower salary and benefits expense. Results for all periods disclosed included net interest expense related to maintaining the liquidity pool discussed in Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity Liquidity Management , as well as interest expense related to other corporate indebtedness. 54 Table of Contents Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity Our balance sheet management objectives are to maintain: Capital Strategy Our objective is to retain sufficient levels of capital generated through earnings and other sources to maintain a solid equity capital base and to provide flexibility to support future business growth. We believe capital allocated to growing businesses with a return on risk-adjusted equity in excess of our costs will generate shareholder value. The level and composition of our consolidated capital position are determined through our internal capital adequacy assessment process, which reflects our business activities, as well as marketplace conditions and requirements or expectations of credit rating agencies, regulators and shareholders, among others. Our consolidated capital position is also influenced by subsidiary capital requirements. As a bank holding company, we are also subject to regulatory requirements administered by the U.S. federal banking agencies. The Federal Reserve has established specific capital adequacy guidelines that involve quantitative measures of assets, liabilities and certain off-balance sheet items. Beginning in 2014, as a Basel III Advanced Approaches institution, we report our capital ratios using Basel III capital definitions, inclusive of transition provisions, and Basel I risk-weighted assets. Beginning in 2015, we will report our capital ratios using the Basel III capital definitions, inclusive of transition provisions, and the Basel III Standardized Approach for calculating risk-weighted assets. The Basel III standards will be fully phased-in by January 1, 2019. We have also adopted Basel III in certain non-U.S. jurisdictions. During 2014, we began reporting capital adequacy standards on a parallel basis to regulators under Basel requirements for a Basel III Advanced Approaches institution. The parallel period will continue until we receive regulatory approval to exit parallel reporting and subsequently begin publicly reporting our capital ratios using both Basel III Standardized and Advanced Approaches. 55 Table of Contents The following table presents our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratios and those of our significant bank subsidiaries, as well as additional ratios widely utilized in the marketplace, as of September 30, 2014. Table 18: Regulatory Risk-Based Capital and Leverage Ratios The transition provisions for 2014 under Basel III cause our reported capital ratios to be higher than they would have been under the prior regulatory standards, known as Basel I. Specifically, the Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital and Tier 1 risk-based capital ratios would have been approximately 35 basis points lower under Basel I. The largest contributor to the difference is the way intangible assets are being treated and ultimately transitioned in over a 5-year period under Basel III. The following provides definitions for our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratio, which are calculated as per standard regulatory guidance, if applicable: Risk-Weighted Assets Assets are weighted for risk according to a formula used by the Federal Reserve to conform to capital adequacy guidelines. On and off-balance sheet items are weighted for risk, with off-balance sheet items converted to balance sheet equivalents, using risk conversion factors, before being allocated a risk-adjusted weight. The off-balance sheet items comprise a minimal part of the overall calculation. Risk-weighted assets under Basel I as of September 30, 2014 were $128.9 billion. Common Equity Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio The Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio is calculated as Common Equity Tier 1 capital, divided by risk-weighted assets. Common Equity Tier 1 is the sum of common shareholders equity, adjusted for ineligible goodwill and intangible assets, certain deferred tax assets, as well as certain other comprehensive income items as follows: net unrealized gains/losses on securities and derivatives, and net unrealized pension and other postretirement benefit losses, all net of tax. Common Equity Tier 1 capital as of September 30, 2014 was $17.6 billion. 56 Table of Contents Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio The Tier 1 capital ratio is calculated as Tier 1 capital divided by risk-weighted assets. Tier 1 capital is the sum of Common Equity Tier 1 capital, certain perpetual preferred stock (not applicable to us), and third-party non-controlling interests in consolidated subsidiaries. Tier 1 capital as of September 30, 2014 was $17.6 billion. Total Risk-Based Capital Ratio The total risk-based capital ratio is calculated as the sum of Tier 1 capital and Tier 2 capital, divided by risk-weighted assets. Tier 2 capital is the sum of the allowance for receivable and loan losses (limited to 1.25 percent of risk-weighted assets) and a portion of the unrealized gains on equity securities, plus a $750 million subordinated hybrid security, for which we received approval from the Federal Reserve for treatment as Tier 2 capital. Tier 2 capital as of September 30, 2014 was $1.9 billion. The $750 million subordinated hybrid security does not meet the requirements of Tier 2 capital under Basel III, and is being transitioned out of capital beginning in 2014. As a result, the amount included in Tier 2 capital is $375 million. See Fully Phased-in Basel III section. Tier 1 Leverage Ratio The Tier 1 leverage ratio is calculated by dividing Tier 1 capital by our average total consolidated assets for the most recent quarter. Average total consolidated assets as of September 30, 2014 were $151.6 billion. The following provides a definition for Tangible Common Equity to Risk-Weighted Assets ratio, which is widely used in the marketplace, although it may be calculated differently by different companies: Common Equity and Tangible Common Equity to Risk-Weighted Assets Ratios Common equity equals our shareholders equity of $20.2 billion as of September 30, 2014, and tangible common equity, a non-GAAP measure, equals common equity less goodwill and other intangibles of $3.8 billion as of September 30, 2014. We believe presenting the ratio of tangible common equity to risk-weighted assets is a useful measure of evaluating the strength of our capital position. We seek to maintain capital levels and ratios in excess of the minimum regulatory requirements and finance such capital in a cost efficient manner; failure to maintain minimum capital levels could affect our status as a financial holding company and cause the respective regulatory agencies to take actions that could limit our business operations. Our primary source of equity capital has been the generation of net income. Historically, capital generated through net income and other sources, such as the exercise of stock options by employees, has exceeded the annual growth in our capital requirements. To the extent capital has exceeded business, regulatory and rating agency requirements, we have historically returned excess capital to shareholders through our regular common share dividend and share repurchase program. We maintain certain flexibility to shift capital across our businesses as appropriate. For example, we may infuse additional capital into subsidiaries to maintain capital at targeted levels in consideration of debt ratings and regulatory requirements. These infused amounts can affect the capital profile and liquidity levels at the American Express parent company level. We do not currently intend or foresee a need to shift capital from non-U.S. subsidiaries with permanently reinvested earnings to a U.S. parent company. 57 Table of Contents Fully Phased-in Basel III Basel III, when fully phased-in, will require bank holding companies and their bank subsidiaries to maintain more capital than prior requirements, with a greater emphasis on common equity. We estimate that had Basel III been fully phased-in during the nine months ended September 30, 2014, our reported Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital and Tier 1 risk-based capital ratios would have been 12.9 percent and our reported Tier 1 leverage ratio would have been 11.1 percent. As of September 30, 2014, had the Basel III rules been fully phased-in, our supplementary leverage ratio would be 9.3 percent. 5 These ratios are calculated using the Standardized Approach for determining risk-weighted assets. As noted previously, we are currently taking steps toward Basel III Advanced Approaches implementation in the U.S. Our $750 million subordinated hybrid security, which was previously fully included in Tier 2 capital (but not in Tier 1 capital), does not meet the requirements of Tier 2 capital under Basel III. The phase-out of this subordinated hybrid security from Tier 2 capital began in the first quarter of 2014, which affects our total risk-based capital ratio. However, this ratio is expected to remain well in excess of the required minimum. The Basel capital standards establish minimum requirements for the Tier 1 risk-based capital ratios that are 1.5% higher than the minimum requirements for Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital ratios. This difference between Tier 1 capital, which includes common equity and qualifying preferred securities, and Common Equity Tier 1 is also present in the minimum capital requirements within Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (CCAR), beginning with the 2014 plan submissions. The Company s 2014 CCAR capital plan thus included the issuance of Tier 1 eligible preferred shares, to finance a portion of the Tier 1 capital requirements in excess of common equity requirements. We anticipate that the issuance of amounts included in our capital plan will occur during the fourth quarter of 2014 and first quarter of 2015, subject to market conditions. The following provides definitions for Fully Phased-in Basel III capital ratios as defined by the Basel III rules using the Standardized Approach. All calculations are non-GAAP measures. Fully Phased-in Basel III Common Equity Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio The Fully Phased-in Basel III Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio is calculated as Common Equity Tier 1 under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules divided by risk-weighted assets under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules. Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio The Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio is calculated as Tier 1 capital under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules divided by risk-weighted assets under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules. 58 Table of Contents The following table presents a comparison of our Common Equity Tier 1 and Tier 1 risk-based capital under Transitional Basel III rules to our estimated Common Equity Tier 1 and Tier 1 risk-based capital under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules. Table 19: Transitional Basel III versus Fully Phased-in Basel III Fully Phased-in Basel III Risk-Weighted Assets The Fully Phased-in Basel III risk-weighted assets reflect our Basel I risk-weighted assets, adjusted under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules. This includes incremental risk weighting applied to deferred tax assets and significant investments in unconsolidated financial institutions, as well as exposures to past due accounts, equities and sovereigns. The Fully Phased-in Basel III risk-weighted assets as of September 30, 2014 were estimated to be $130.1 billion. Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 Leverage Ratio The Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 leverage ratio is calculated by dividing Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 capital by our average total consolidated assets. Basel III Supplementary Leverage Ratio The supplementary leverage ratio under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules is calculated by dividing Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 capital by our total assets for supplementary leverage capital purposes under Basel III. Total assets for supplementary leverage capital purposes reflect total consolidated assets with adjustments for Tier 1 capital deductions, off-balance sheet derivatives, undrawn unconditionally cancellable commitments and other off-balance sheet liabilities. Total assets for supplementary leverage capital purposes as of September 30, 2014 were estimated to be $179.9 billion. Share Repurchases and Dividends We have a share repurchase program to return excess capital to shareholders. The share repurchases reduce shares outstanding and offset, in whole or part, the issuance of new shares as part of employee compensation plans. During the three and nine months ended September 30, 2014, we returned $1.4 billion and $4.0 billion, respectively, to our shareholders in the form of dividends ($0.3 billion and $0.8 billion, respectively) and share repurchases ($1.1 billion and $3.2 billion, respectively). We repurchased 13 million common shares at an average price of $88.49 in the third quarter of 2014. These dividend and share repurchase amounts represent approximately 89 percent and 83 percent of total capital generated during the three and nine month periods, respectively. These percentages for 2014 are significantly greater than the on average and over time target to distribute approximately 50 percent of the capital to shareholders as dividends or through the repurchases of common stock. These distribution percentages result from the strength of our capital ratios and the amount of capital we generate from net income and through employee stock plans in relation to the amount of capital required to support our organic business growth and through acquisitions. We are expecting to execute our share repurchase program, subject to market conditions and pursuant to our capital plan, which includes up to $1.15 billion in share repurchases for the remainder of 2014. 59 Table of Contents Funding Strategy Our principal funding objective is to maintain broad and well-diversified funding sources to allow us to meet our maturing obligations, cost-effectively finance current and future asset growth in our global businesses as well as to maintain a strong liquidity profile. The diversity of funding sources by type of debt instrument, by maturity and by investor base, among other factors, provides additional insulation from the impact of disruptions in any one type of debt, maturity or investor. The mix of our funding in any period will seek to achieve cost efficiency consistent with both maintaining diversified sources and achieving our liquidity objectives. Our funding strategy and activities are integrated into our asset-liability management activities. We have in place a funding policy covering American Express Company and all of our subsidiaries. Our proprietary card businesses are the primary asset-generating businesses, with significant assets in both domestic and international Card Member receivable and lending activities. Our financing needs are in large part a consequence of our proprietary card-issuing businesses and the maintenance of a liquidity position to support all of our business activities, such as merchant payments. We generally pay merchants for card transactions prior to reimbursement by Card Members and therefore fund the merchant payments during the period Card Member loans and receivables are outstanding. We also have additional financing needs associated with general corporate purposes, including acquisition activities. We seek to raise funds to meet all of our financing needs, including seasonal and other working capital needs, while also seeking to maintain sufficient highly liquid assets to meet our net cash flow needs under stressed environments, which include the scheduled maturities of funding obligations. We currently expect to satisfy Basel III s Liquidity Coverage Ratio standard, based upon our current understanding of the requirements, through our current funding programs and liquidity strategies. During the third quarter of 2014, we issued (i) $1.0 billion of Class A asset-backed securities from American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust) with a maturity of three years and a coupon of 1.26 percent, (ii) $1.5 billion of Class A asset-backed securities from the Lending Trust with a maturity of three years and a coupon of 1.49 percent, (iii) $1.9 billion of dual-tranche senior unsecured notes from American Express Credit Corporation (Credco) with a maturity of five years consisting of $1.5 billion of fixed-rate senior notes with a coupon of 2.25 percent and $400 million of floating-rate senior notes at 3-month LIBOR plus 49 basis points and (iv) $1.0 billion of dual-tranche senior unsecured notes from Credco with a maturity of three years consisting of $700 million of fixed-rate senior notes with a coupon of 1.55 percent and $300 million of floating-rate senior notes at 3-month LIBOR plus 30 basis points. Our equity capital and funding strategies are designed, among other things, to maintain appropriate and stable unsecured debt ratings from the major credit rating agencies: Moody s Investor Services (Moody s), Standard Poor s (S P), Fitch Ratings (Fitch) and Dominion Bond Rating Services (DBRS). Such ratings help support our access to cost-effective unsecured funding as part of our overall funding strategy. Our asset-backed securitization (ABS) activities are rated separately. 60 Table of Contents Table 20: Unsecured Debt Ratings Downgrades in the ratings of our unsecured debt or asset securitization program securities could result in higher funding costs, as well as higher fees related to borrowings under our unused lines of credit. Declines in credit ratings could also reduce our borrowing capacity in the unsecured debt and asset securitization capital markets. We believe our funding mix, including the proportion of U.S. retail deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), should reduce the impact that credit rating downgrades would have on our funding capacity and costs. Deposit Programs We offer deposits within our American Express Centurion Bank (Centurion Bank) and American Express Bank, FSB (FSB) subsidiaries (together, the Banks). These funds are currently insured up to $250,000 per account holder through the FDIC. Our ability to obtain deposit funding and offer competitive interest rates is dependent on the Banks capital levels. We, through the FSB, have a direct retail deposit program, Personal Savings from American Express, to supplement our distribution of deposit products sourced through third-party distribution channels. The direct retail program makes FDIC-insured certificates of deposit (CDs) and high-yield savings account products available directly to consumers. We held the following deposits as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013: Table 21: Customer Deposits Asset Securitization Programs We periodically securitize Card Member receivables and loans arising from our card business, as the securitization market provides us with cost-effective funding. Securitization of Card Member receivables and loans is accomplished through the transfer of those assets to a trust, which in turn issues securities collateralized by the transferred assets to third party investors. The proceeds from issuance are distributed to us, through our wholly owned subsidiaries, as consideration for the transferred assets. 61 Table of Contents The receivables and loans being securitized are reported as assets on our Consolidated Balance Sheets and the related securities issued to third-party investors are reported as long-term debt. Under the respective terms of the securitization trust agreements, the occurrence of certain triggering events associated with the performance of the assets of each trust could result in payment of trust expenses, establishment of reserve funds, or in a worst-case scenario, early amortization of investor securities. During the nine months ended September 30, 2014, no such triggering events occurred. Liquidity Management Our liquidity objective is to maintain access to a diverse set of on- and off-balance sheet liquidity sources. We maintain liquidity sources in amounts sufficient to meet business requirements and expected future financial obligations for a period of at least twelve months in the event we are unable to raise new funds under our regular funding programs during a substantial weakening in economic conditions. We have in place a liquidity risk policy that sets out our approach to managing liquidity risk on an enterprise-wide basis. We incur and accept liquidity risk arising in the normal course of offering our products and services. The liquidity risks that we are exposed to can arise from a variety of sources, and thus our liquidity management strategy includes a variety of parameters, assessments and guidelines, including, but not limited to: We maintain liquidity resources sufficient to meet our projected net cash flow needs during stressed environments over various time horizons, including 30-day and 12-month periods. Our liquidity resources include highly liquid assets, as well as a variety of other contingent liquidity resources, such as access to undrawn amounts under our secured borrowing facilities and committed bank credit facilities. In addition, the Company has access to secured borrowing at the Federal Reserve discount window. As of September 30, 2014, we had $15.6 billion in excess cash and $0.1 billion of securities held as collateral available to fund long-term maturities, which includes $21.3 billion classified as cash and cash equivalents, less $5.7 billion of cash available to fund day-to-day operations. The $15.6 billion represents cash residing in the U.S. 62 Table of Contents The upcoming approximate maturities of our long-term unsecured debt issued in connection with asset-backed securitizations and long-term certificates of deposit are as follows: Table 22: Debt Maturities Our financing needs for the next 12 months are expected to arise from these debt and deposit maturities as well as changes in business needs, including changes in outstanding Card Member loans and receivables and acquisition activities. We consider various factors in determining the amount of liquidity we maintain, such as economic and financial market conditions, seasonality in business operations, growth in our businesses, potential acquisitions or dispositions, the cost and availability of alternative liquidity sources, and regulatory and credit rating agency considerations. The yield we receive on our cash and readily marketable securities is, generally, less than the interest expense on the sources of funding for these balances. Thus, we incur substantial net interest costs on these amounts. The level of net interest costs will be dependent on the size of our cash and readily marketable securities holdings, as well as the difference between our cost of funding these amounts and their investment yields. Securitized Borrowing Capacity As of September 30, 2014, we maintained our committed, revolving, secured borrowing facility, with a maturity date of July 15, 2016, that gives us the right to sell up to $3.0 billion face amount of eligible AAA notes from the American Express Issuance Trust II (the Charge Trust). We also maintained our committed, revolving, secured borrowing facility, with a maturity date of September 15, 2017, that gives us the right to sell up to $2.0 billion face amount of eligible AAA certificates from the American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust). Both facilities are used in the ordinary course of business to fund seasonal working capital needs, as well as to further enhance our contingent funding resources. As of September 30, 2014, no amounts were drawn on the Charge Trust facility or the Lending Trust facility. Federal Reserve Discount Window As insured depository institutions, the Banks may borrow from the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, subject to the amount of qualifying collateral that they may pledge. The Federal Reserve has indicated that both credit and charge card receivables are a form of qualifying collateral for secured borrowings made through the discount window. Whether specific assets will be considered qualifying collateral and the amount that may be borrowed against the collateral, remain at the discretion of the Federal Reserve. We had approximately $52 billion as of September 30, 2014 in U.S. credit card loans and charge card receivables that could be sold over time through our existing securitization trusts, or pledged in return for secured borrowings to provide further liquidity, subject in each case to applicable market conditions and eligibility criteria. 63 Table of Contents Committed Bank Credit Facilities In addition to the secured borrowing facilities described earlier in this section, we maintained committed syndicated bank credit facilities as of September 30, 2014 of $7.0 billion through facilities in the U.S. and Australia. Our total committed bank credit facilities expire as follows: Table 23: Expiration of Committed Syndicated Bank Credit Facilities Cash Flows The following table summarizes our cash flow activity, followed by a discussion of the major drivers impacting operating, investing and financing cash flows. Table 24: Cash Flows Cash Flows from Operating Activities Cash flows from operating activities primarily include net income adjusted for (i) non-cash items included in net income and (ii) changes in the balances of operating assets and liabilities, which can vary significantly in the normal course of business due to the amount and timing of various payments. For the nine months ended September 30, 2014, net cash provided by operating activities was $8.6 billion as a result of net income of $4.4 billion adjusted by non cash items such as certain changes in provisions for losses, depreciation and amortization, deferred taxes, stock-based compensation and the pretax gain of $641 million related to the GBT JV transaction. The increase in accounts payable and other liabilities, which is a source of cash, was driven by higher discount business volumes and associated payables to merchants. For the nine months ended September 30, 2013, net cash provided by operating activities was $8.2 billion as a result of net income of $4.1 billion adjusted by non cash items such as certain changes in provisions for losses, depreciation and amortization, deferred taxes and stock-based compensation. In addition, other sources of cash include an increase in accounts payable and other liabilities, driven by higher discount business volumes, as well as a decrease in Other assets due to the utilization of certain prepaid co-brand rewards points. Cash Flows from Investing Activities Our investing activities primarily include changes in Card Member loans and receivables and our available for sale investment portfolio. For the nine months ended September 30, 2014, net cash used in investing activities was $3.0 billion consisting of a net increase in Card Member receivables, primarily driven by increases in Card Member spend, as well as purchases of premises and equipment, net of sales. 64 Table of Contents For the nine months ended September 30, 2013, net cash used in investing activities was $1.5 billion consisting of a net increase in Card Member receivables, driven by higher Card Member spend, as well as purchases of premises and equipment, net of sales. This was partially offset by a net decrease in Card Member loans resulting from higher pay downs. Cash Flows from Financing Activities Our financing activities primarily include issuing and repaying debt, changes in customer deposits, issuing and repurchasing our common shares, and paying dividends. For the nine months ended September 30, 2014, net cash used in financing activities was $3.7 billion driven by $3.2 billion in repurchases of American Express common shares as well as a $0.9 billion net reduction in short- and long-term debt. For the nine months ended September 30, 2013, net cash used in financing activities was $6.6 billion driven by a $5.6 billion net reduction in short- and long-term debt as well as $3.2 billion in repurchases of American Express common shares, partially offset by a net increase in customer deposits of $2.3 billion. Certain Other Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements As of September 30, 2014, we had approximately $278 billion of unused credit available to Card Members as part of established lending product agreements. Total unused credit available to Card Members does not represent potential future cash requirements, as a significant portion of this unused credit will likely not be drawn. Our charge card products generally have no pre-set limit, and therefore are not reflected in unused credit available to Card Members. To mitigate counterparty credit risk related to derivatives, the Company accepted noncash collateral in the form of security interests in U.S. Treasury securities from its derivatives counterparties with a fair value of $111 million as of September 30, 2014, none of which was sold or repledged. 65 Table of Contents OTHER REPORTING MATTERS Certain Legislative, Regulatory and Other Developments As a participant in the financial services industry, and as a bank holding company, we are subject to comprehensive examination and supervision by the Federal Reserve and to a range of laws and regulations that impact our business and operations. In light of legislative initiatives over the last several years and continuing regulatory reform implementation, compliance requirements and expenditures have risen for financial services firms, including us, and we expect compliance requirements and expenditures will continue to rise in the future. Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act The Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Dodd-Frank) contains a wide array of provisions intended to govern the practices and oversight of financial institutions and other participants in the financial markets. Among other matters, the law created an independent Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (the CFPB), which has broad rulemaking authority over providers of credit, savings, payment and other consumer financial products and services with respect to certain federal consumer financial laws. Moreover, the CFPB has examination and enforcement authority with respect to certain federal consumer financial laws for providers of consumer financial products and services, including American Express Company and certain of our subsidiaries. The CFPB is directed to prohibit unfair, deceptive or abusive acts or practices, and to ensure that all consumers have access to fair, transparent and competitive markets for consumer financial products and services. The review of products and practices to prevent unfair, deceptive or abusive conduct will be a continuing focus of the CFPB and banking regulators more broadly, as well as our own internal reviews. Internal and regulatory reviews have resulted in, and are likely to continue to result in, changes to our practices, products and procedures. Such reviews are also likely to continue to result in increased costs related to regulatory oversight, supervision and examination, and additional restitution to our Card Members and may result in additional regulatory actions, including civil money penalties. In December 2013, we announced that certain of our subsidiaries reached settlements with several banking regulators, including the CFPB, to resolve regulatory reviews of marketing and billing practices related to several credit card add-on products. For a description of these settlements, see Legal Proceedings in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013. In October 2012, we announced that American Express Company and certain of our subsidiaries reached settlements with several bank regulators, including the CFPB, relating to certain aspects of our U.S. consumer card practices, which requires us to undertake certain actions that have continued in 2014. For a description of these settlements, see Legal Proceedings in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012. Dodd-Frank prohibits payment card networks from restricting merchants from offering discounts or incentives to customers to pay with particular forms of payment, such as cash, check, credit or debit card, or restricting merchants from setting certain minimum, and for certain merchants maximum, transaction amounts for credit cards, as long as any such discounts or incentives or any minimum or maximum transaction amounts do not discriminate on the basis of the issuer or network and comply with applicable federal or state disclosure requirements. Under Dodd-Frank, the Federal Reserve is also authorized to regulate interchange fees paid to financial institutions on debit card and certain general-use prepaid card transactions to ensure that they are reasonable and proportional to the cost of processing individual transactions, and to prohibit payment card networks and issuers from requiring transactions to be processed on a single payment network or fewer than two unaffiliated networks. The Federal Reserve s rule provides that the regulations on interchange and routing do not apply to a three-party network like American Express when it acts as both the issuer and the network for prepaid cards, and we are therefore not a payment card network as that term is defined and used for the specific purposes of the rule. 66 Table of Contents Dodd-Frank also authorizes the Federal Reserve to establish enhanced prudential regulatory requirements, including capital, leverage and liquidity standards, risk management requirements, concentration limits on credit exposures, mandatory resolution plans (so-called living wills ) and stress tests for, among others, large bank holding companies, such as American Express Company, that have greater than $50 billion in assets. We are also required to develop and maintain a capital plan, and to submit the capital plan to the Federal Reserve for our quantitative and qualitative review under the Federal Reserve s CCAR process. In addition, certain derivative transactions are now required to be centrally cleared, which have increased our collateral posting requirements. Certain aspects of Dodd-Frank are subject to further rule making and will take effect over several years, making it difficult to anticipate the overall financial impact on us or across the industry. Department of Justice Litigation The U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) and certain states attorneys general have brought an action against us alleging that the provisions in our card acceptance agreements with merchants that prohibit merchants from discriminating against our card products at the point of sale violate the U.S. antitrust laws. See Part II, Item 1. Legal Proceedings for descriptions of the DOJ action and related cases. Visa and MasterCard, which were also defendants in the DOJ and state action, entered into a settlement agreement and have been dismissed as parties pursuant to that agreement. The settlement enjoins Visa and MasterCard, with certain exceptions, from adopting or enforcing rules or entering into contracts that prohibit merchants from engaging in various actions to steer cardholders to other card products or payment forms at the point of sale. If similar conditions were imposed on American Express, it could have a material adverse effect on our business. Other Legislative and Regulatory Initiatives Various countries in which we operate have been considering and in some cases adopting legislation and rules that would or do impose changes on certain practices of card issuers, merchant acquirers and payment networks including antitrust actions, legislation to regulate particular practices or prices and the establishment of broad and ongoing regulatory oversight regimes for payment systems. Regulators and legislators outside the U.S. have focused on the fees merchants pay to accept cards, including the way bankcard network members collectively set the interchange (that is, the fee paid by the bankcard merchant acquirer to the card issuer in four-party payment networks, like Visa and MasterCard), as well as terms of merchant acceptance rules and contracts. Although, unlike the Visa and MasterCard networks, the American Express three-party payment network does not have interchange fees or collectively set any fees or rules, antitrust actions and government regulation relating to merchant pricing or terms of merchant rules and contracts could affect all networks directly or indirectly. For example, the European Commission s (the Commission) decision to make binding Visa Europe s commitments to cap its cross-border credit card multilateral interchange fees to 30 basis points and change its rules on how cross-border interchange is applied could negatively impact the discount revenue we derive from our business in the European Union (EU) as a result of downward marketplace pressure on merchant fees, including our discount rates. Broad regulatory oversight over payment systems can also include, in some cases, requirements for international card networks to be locally licensed and/or to localize aspects of their operations. The development and enforcement of regulatory regimes may adversely affect our ability to maintain or increase our revenues and extend our global network. 67 Table of Contents In January 2012, the Commission published a Green Paper (a document to begin a process of consultation toward potential regulation) covering a range of issues affecting the payments industry. The Commission completed the consultation process and on July 24, 2013, issued its recommendations, which included draft legislation now under consideration within the Council of the European Union and the European Parliament. The Commission s recommendations included a number of proposals that would likely have significant impact across the industry and would apply either in whole or in part to American Express. The proposed changes include: These proposals are currently subject to debate and amendment by the European Parliament and Council of the European Union in a complex legislative process that will also involve the Commission. The Parliament held a preliminary vote in April 2014 broadly in favor of the Commission s proposals with some amendments, including the application of price caps to transactions on three-party networks above an unspecified share threshold and three-party network cards issued with co-brand partners or via agents; the inclusion of commercial cards within the scope of price caps; and the ability of Member States to ban surcharging altogether. The Council has yet to establish its position on the proposals and the Parliament will need to finalize its position in another vote, before the Commission, Parliament and Council ultimately agree on a compromise text. It is therefore too early to assess the exact scope and impact of any final legislation. 68 Table of Contents In certain countries, such as Australia, and in certain Member States in the EU, merchants are permitted by law to surcharge card purchases. While surcharging continues to be actively considered in certain jurisdictions, the benefits to customers have not been apparent in countries that have allowed it, and in some cases regulators are addressing concerns about excessive surcharging by merchants. Surcharging, particularly where it disproportionately impacts American Express Card Members, which is known as differential surcharging, could have a material adverse effect on us if it becomes widespread. The Reserve Bank of Australia allows us and other networks to limit a merchant s right to surcharge to the reasonable cost of card acceptance. In the EU, the Consumer Rights Directive prohibits merchants from surcharging card purchases more than the merchants cost of acceptance in those Member States that permit surcharging. Although neither a legislative nor regulatory initiative, the settlement by MasterCard and Visa in a U.S. merchant class litigation required, among other things, MasterCard and Visa to permit U.S. merchants, subject to certain conditions, to surcharge credit cards, while allowing them to continue to prohibit surcharges on debit and prepaid card transactions. In December 2013, we announced the proposed settlement of a number of U.S. merchant class action lawsuits, which, if approved, would change certain surcharging provisions in our U.S. card acceptance agreements. For a further description of the proposed settlement, see Item 1. Legal Proceedings in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013. Refer to Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for a discussion of capital adequacy requirements established by federal banking regulators. Glossary of Selected Terminology Adjusted average loans Represents average Card Member loans excluding the impact of deferred card fees, net of direct acquisition costs of Card Member loans and certain other immaterial items. Adjusted net interest income Represents net interest income attributable to our Card Member loans portfolio excluding the impact of interest expense and interest income not attributable to our Card Member loans portfolio. Asset securitizations Asset securitization involves the transfer and sale of receivables or loans to a special-purpose entity created for the securitization activity, typically a trust. The trust, in turn, issues securities, commonly referred to as asset-backed securities, that are secured by the transferred receivables or loans. The trust uses the proceeds from the sale of such securities to pay the purchase price for the underlying receivables or loans. The receivables and loans of our Charge Trust and Lending Trust being securitized are reported as assets on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. Average discount rate This calculation is designed to reflect pricing at merchants accepting general purpose American Express cards. It represents the percentage of billed business (both proprietary and GNS) retained by us from merchants we acquire, prior to payments to third parties unrelated to merchant acceptance. Basel III supplementary leverage ratio Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for the definition . Basic cards-in-force Proprietary basic consumer cards-in-force includes basic cards issued to the primary account owner and does not include additional supplemental cards issued on that account. Proprietary basic small business and corporate cards-in-force include basic and supplemental cards issued to employee Card Members. Non-proprietary basic cards-in-force includes cards that are issued and outstanding under network partnership agreements, except for supplemental cards and retail co-brand Card Member accounts which have had no out-of-store spend activity during the prior 12-month period. 69 Table of Contents Billed business Includes activities (including cash advances) related to proprietary cards, cards issued under network partnership agreements (non-proprietary billed business), corporate payments and certain insurance fees charged on proprietary cards. In-store spend activity within retail co-brand portfolios in GNS, from which we earn no revenue, is not included in non-proprietary billed business. Card billed business is reflected in the U.S. or outside the U.S. based on where the issuer is located. Capital ratios Represents the minimum standards established by the regulatory agencies as a measure to determine whether the regulated entity has sufficient capital to absorb on- and off-balance sheet losses beyond current loss accrual estimates. Card Member The individual holder of an issued American Express branded charge or credit card. Card Member loans Represents the outstanding amount due from Card Members for charges made on their American Express credit cards, as well as any interest charges and card-related fees. Card Member loans also include revolving balances on certain American Express charge card products and are net of deferred card fees. Card Member receivables Represents the outstanding amount due from Card Members for charges made on their American Express charge cards as well as any card-related fees. Charge cards Represents cards that generally carry no pre-set spending limits and are primarily designed as a method of payment and not as a means of financing purchases. Charge Card Members generally must pay the full amount billed each month. No finance charges are assessed on charge cards. Each charge card transaction is authorized based on its likely economics reflecting a customer s most recent credit information and spend patterns. Some charge card accounts have an additional lending-on-charge feature that allows revolving certain balances. Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for the definitions under Transitional Basel III and Fully Phased-in Basel III. Credit cards Represents cards that have a range of revolving payment terms, grace periods, and rate and fee structures. Discount revenue Represents revenue earned from fees generally charged to merchants with whom we have entered into a card acceptance agreement for processing Card Member transactions. The discount fee generally is deducted from our payment reimbursing the merchant for Card Member purchases. Discount revenue is reduced by other payments made to merchants, third-party card issuing partners, cash-back reward costs, corporate incentive payments and other contra-revenue items. Four-party network A payment network, such as Visa or MasterCard, in which the card issuer and merchant acquirer are different entities and the network does not have direct relationships with merchants or cardholders. Interest expense Interest expense includes interest incurred primarily to fund Card Member loans, charge card product receivables, general corporate purposes, and liquidity needs, and is recognized as incurred. Interest expense is divided principally into two categories: (i) deposits, which primarily relates to interest expense on deposits taken from customers and institutions and (ii) long-term debt, which primarily relates to interest expense on our long-term financing and short-term borrowings, which primarily relates to interest expense on commercial paper, federal funds purchased, bank overdrafts and other short-term borrowings. 70 Table of Contents Interest income Interest income includes (i) interest on loans, (ii) interest and dividends on investment securities and (iii) interest income on deposits with banks and other. Interest on loans is assessed using the average daily balance method for loans. Unless the loan is classified as non-accrual, interest is recognized based upon the principal amount outstanding in accordance with the terms of the applicable account agreement until the outstanding balance is paid or written off. Interest and dividends on investment securities primarily relates to our performing fixed-income securities. Interest income is accrued as earned using the effective interest method, which adjusts the yield for security premiums and discounts, fees and other payments, so that the related investment security recognizes a constant rate of return on the outstanding balance throughout its term. These amounts are recognized until these securities are in default or when it is likely that future interest payments will not be made as scheduled. Interest income on deposits with banks and other is recognized as earned, and primarily relates to the placement of cash in excess of near-term funding requirements in interest-bearing time deposits, overnight sweep accounts, and other interest-bearing demand and call accounts. Liquidity Coverage Ratio Represents the proposed minimum standards being established by the regulatory agencies as a measure to determine whether the regulated entity has sufficient liquidity to meet liquidity needs in periods of financial and economic stress. Merchant acquisition Represents the signing of merchants to accept American Express-branded cards. Net card fees Represents the card membership fees earned during the period. These fees are recognized as revenue over the covered card membership period (typically one year), net of provision for projected refunds for cancellation of card membership. Net interest yield on Card Member loans Net interest yield on Card Member loans is computed by dividing adjusted net interest income by adjusted average loans, computed on an annualized basis. The calculation of net interest yield on Card Member loans includes interest that is deemed uncollectible. For all presentations of net interest yield on Card Member loans, reserves and net write-offs related to uncollectible interest are recorded through provisions for losses Card Member loans; therefore, such reserves and net write-offs are not included in the net interest yield calculation. Net loss ratio Represents the ratio of ICS and GCS charge card write-offs consisting of principal (resulting from authorized transactions) and fee components, less recoveries, on Card Member receivables expressed as a percentage of gross amounts billed to Card Members. Net write-off rate principal only Represents the amount of Card Member loans or USCS and ICS Card Member receivables written off consisting of principal (resulting from authorized transactions), less recoveries, as a percentage of the average loan balance or USCS and ICS average receivables during the period. Net write-off rate principal, interest and fees Includes, in the calculation of the net write-off rate, amounts for interest and fees in addition to principal for Card Member loans, and fees in addition to principal for USCS and ICS Card Member receivables. Operating expenses Represents salaries and employee benefits, professional services, occupancy and equipment, communications and other expenses. 71 Table of Contents Return on average equity Calculated by dividing one-year period net income by one-year average total shareholders equity. Return on average segment capital Calculated by dividing one-year period segment income by one-year average segment capital. Return on average tangible segment capital Computed in the same manner as return on average segment capital except the computation of average tangible segment capital excludes from average segment capital average goodwill and other intangibles. Risk-weighted assets Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for the definitions under Basel I and Fully Phased-in Basel III. Segment capital Represents the capital allocated to a segment based upon specific business operational needs, risk measures, and regulatory capital requirements. Three-party network A payment network, such as American Express, that acts as both the card issuer and merchant acquirer. Tier 1 leverage ratio Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for the definitions under Transitional Basel III and Fully Phased-in Basel III. Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for the definitions under Transitional Basel III and Fully Phased-in Basel III. Total cards-in-force Represents the number of cards that are issued and outstanding. Non-proprietary cards-in-force includes all cards that are issued and outstanding under network partnership agreements, except for retail co-brand Card Member accounts which have no out-of-store spend activity during the prior 12-month period. Total risk-based capital ratio Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for the definition. Travel sales Represents the total dollar amount of travel transaction volume for airline, hotel, car rental, and other travel arrangements made for consumers and small businesses. We earn revenue on these transactions by charging a transaction or management fee. 72 Table of Contents °Item 3. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK Market risk is the risk to earnings or value resulting from movements in market prices. Our market risk exposure is primarily generated by interest rate risk in our card, insurance and Travelers Cheque businesses, as well as our investment portfolios, and foreign exchange risk in our operations outside the United States. As described in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013 (refer to Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk ): These sensitivities are based on the 2013 year-end positions, and assume that all relevant maturities and types of interest rates and foreign exchange rates that affect our results would increase instantaneously and simultaneously and to the same degree. There were no material changes in these market risks since December 31, 2013. °Item 4. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES Our management, with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has evaluated the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act)) as of the end of the period covered by this report. Based on such evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have concluded that, as of the end of such period, our disclosure controls and procedures are effective and designed to ensure that the information required to be disclosed in our reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the requisite time periods specified in the applicable rules and forms, and that it is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act) during the fiscal quarter to which this report relates that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting. Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-looking Statements This report includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which are subject to risks and uncertainties. The forward-looking statements, which address our expected business and financial performance, among other matters, contain words such as believe, expect, estimate, anticipate, optimistic, intend, plan, aim, will, may, should, could, would, likely, and similar expressions. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date on which they are made. We undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements, include, but are not limited to, the following: 73 Table of Contents 74 Table of Contents 75 Table of Contents A further description of these uncertainties and other risks can be found in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013 and our other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. PART II. OTHER INFORMATION °Item 1. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS We and our subsidiaries are involved in a number of legal and arbitration proceedings, including class actions, arising out of the conduct of our respective business activities. We believe we have meritorious defenses to each of these actions and intend to defend them vigorously. In the course of our business, we and our subsidiaries are also subject to governmental examinations, information gathering requests, subpoenas, inquiries and investigations. We believe we are not a party to, nor are any of our properties the subject of, any pending legal, arbitration, regulatory or investigative proceedings that would have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial condition or liquidity. However, it is possible that the outcome of any such proceeding could have a material impact on results of operations in any particular reporting period as the proceedings are resolved. Certain legal proceedings involving us or our subsidiaries are further described in this section and others, for which there have been no subsequent material developments since the filing of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, are described in such report. For those legal proceedings and governmental examinations described in this section and in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, where a loss is reasonably possible in future periods, whether in excess of a related accrued liability or where there is no accrued liability, and for which we are able to estimate a range of possible loss, the current estimated range is zero to $350 million in excess of the accrued liability (if any) related to those matters. This aggregate range represents management s estimate of possible loss with respect to these matters and is based on currently available information. This estimated range of possible loss does not represent our maximum loss exposure. The legal proceedings and governmental examinations underlying the estimated range will change from time to time and actual results may vary significantly from current estimates. For additional information, refer to Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements. Corporate Matters During the last few years as regulatory interest in credit card network pricing to merchants or terms of merchant rules and contracts has increased, we have responded to many inquiries from banking and competition authorities throughout the world. 76 Table of Contents In 2010, the DOJ, along with Attorneys General from Arizona, Connecticut, Hawaii (Hawaii has since withdrawn its claim), Idaho, Illinois, Iowa, Maryland, Michigan, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, Ohio, Rhode Island, Tennessee, Texas, Utah and Vermont filed a complaint in the U.S. District Court for the Eastern District of New York against us, MasterCard International Incorporated and Visa, Inc., alleging a violation of Section 1 of the Sherman Antitrust Act. The complaint alleges that the defendants policies prohibiting merchants from steering a customer to use another network s card, another type of card or another method of payment ( anti-steering and non-discrimination rules and contractual provisions) violate the antitrust laws. The complaint seeks a judgment permanently enjoining the defendants from enforcing their anti-steering and non-discrimination rules and contractual provisions. The complaint does not seek monetary damages. The DOJ matter was coordinated pre-trial with individual and putative class actions pending in the Eastern District of New York against American Express brought by merchants alleging that our anti-steering provisions in its merchant acceptance agreements with the plaintiffs violate federal antitrust laws. As alleged by the plaintiffs, these provisions prevent merchants from offering consumers incentives to use alternative forms of payment when consumers wish to use an American Express-branded card. Plaintiffs seek damages and injunctive relief. In July 2004, we were named as a defendant in a putative class action captioned The Marcus Corporation v. American Express Company, et al. , in which the plaintiffs allege an unlawful antitrust tying arrangement between certain of our charge cards and credit cards in violation of various state and federal laws. The plaintiffs in these actions seek injunctive relief and an unspecified amount of damages. In December 2013, we announced a proposed settlement of the Marcus case and the putative class actions challenging our anti-steering or non-discrimination provisions. The settlement, which provides for certain injunctive relief for the proposed classes, received preliminary approval in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York. The final approval hearing was held on September 17, 2014 and we are awaiting decision. Trial of the DOJ matter concluded on August 18, 2014. Closing arguments were held on October 9, 2014 following submission of post-trial briefs. A trial date for the individual merchant actions has not been set. Defendants motion for summary judgment in the individual merchant actions is pending. We are a defendant in a class action captioned Kaufman v. American Express Travel Related Services , which was filed on February 14, 2007, and is pending in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois. Plaintiffs principal allegation is that our gift cards violate consumer protection statutes because consumers allegedly have difficulty spending small residual amounts on the gift cards prior to the imposition of monthly service fees. The Court preliminarily certified a settlement class consisting of (with some exceptions) all purchasers, recipients and holders of all gift cards issued by American Express from January 1, 2002 through the date of preliminary approval of the settlement. We are also a defendant in Goodman v. American Express Travel Related Services , a putative class action pending in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York, that involves allegations similar to those made in Kaufman . Plaintiffs in Goodman have intervened in the Kaufman proceedings and will be subject to any final settlement in Kaufman that may be approved over their objections. A final settlement approval hearing was held on June 11, 2014 and we are awaiting decision. U.S. Card Services and Global Merchant Services Matters In July 2004, a purported class action complaint, Ross, et al. v. American Express Company, American Express Travel Related Services and American Express Centurion Bank , was filed in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York alleging that we conspired with Visa, MasterCard and Diners Club in the setting of foreign currency conversion rates and in the inclusion of arbitration clauses in certain of their cardholder agreements. The suit seeks injunctive relief and unspecified damages. The class is defined as all Visa, MasterCard and Diners Club general-purpose cardholders who used cards issued by any of the MDL Defendant Banks. American Express Card Members are not part of the class. The settlement of the claims asserted on behalf of the damage class concerning foreign currency conversion rates was approved in 2012. On April 10, 2014, following a trial of the claims asserted by the injunction class concerning cardholder arbitration clauses, the Court dismissed plaintiffs claims and granted judgment in favor of us. Plaintiffs have appealed. 77 Table of Contents In October 2009, a putative class action, captioned Lopez, et al. v. American Express Bank, FSB and American Express Centurion Bank , was filed in the United States District Court for the Central District of California. The amended complaint sought to certify a class of California American Express Card Members whose interest rates were changed from fixed to variable in or around August 2009 or otherwise increased. On August 20, 2014, plaintiffs filed an amended nationwide complaint and an unopposed motion for preliminary approval of a settlement of the claims alleged in that complaint. The settlement provides for certain relief to class members, attorneys fees and costs of up to $6 million. On September 22, 2014, the motion for preliminary approval was denied without prejudice to renew. The parties are responding to the court s questions regarding the class notice and claims processes and the request for preliminary approval will be renewed. In September 2010, a putative class action, captioned Meeks v. American Express Centurion Bank , was filed in Fulton County Superior Court, Georgia and later moved to federal court. Plaintiffs sought to certify a nationwide class of all American Express Card Members who received unilateral interest rate increases despite their accounts being in good standing. In 2013, two putative class actions, captioned Seldes v. American Express Centurion Bank and Manhattan Steamboat LLC v. American Express Bank, FSB , were filed by plaintiffs making allegations similar to those in Meeks and seeking to certify nationwide classes. These actions have been dismissed with prejudice. In October 2012, a putative class action captioned Clarke v. American Express Company, et al . was filed in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York alleging that American Express Company, American Express Travel Related Services, Inc., American Express Centurion Bank and American Express Bank, FSB violated state consumer protection laws, state common law and federal statutory law in the marketing, selling and implementation of a credit card product known as Account Protector. The complaint seeks unspecified compensatory and punitive damages along with injunctive and declaratory relief. Plaintiffs have dismissed this action without prejudice. International Matters In a class action captioned Sylvan Adams v. Amex Bank of Canada , filed in the Superior Court of Quebec, District of Montreal in 2004, plaintiffs allege that prior to December 2003, Amex Bank of Canada charged a foreign currency conversion commission on transactions to purchase goods and services in currencies other than Canadian dollars and failed to disclose the commissions in monthly billing statements or solicitations directed to prospective Card Members. The action further alleges that conversion commissions made on foreign currency transactions are credit charges under the Quebec Consumer Protection Act (the QCPA ) and cannot be charged prior to the 21-day grace period under the QCPA. The class, consisting of all personal and small business Card Members residing in Quebec that purchased goods or services in a foreign currency prior to December 2003, claims reimbursement of all foreign currency conversion commissions, CDN$1,000 in punitive damages per class member, interest and fees and costs. On June 11, 2009, following trial, the Superior Court rendered a judgment in favor of the plaintiffs against Amex Bank of Canada and awarded damages in the amount of approximately CDN$13.1 million plus interest on the non-disclosure claims, and punitive damages in the amount of CDN$2.5 million. The Court of Appeal overturned the decision in part, with regard to the award of punitive damages. Amex Bank of Canada further appealed and that appeal was heard in the Supreme Court of Canada on February 13, 2014. On September 19, 2014, the Supreme Court denied the appeal. 78 Table of Contents In a class action captioned Marcotte v. Bank of Montreal , et al., filed in the Superior Court of Quebec, District of Montreal in 2003, against Amex Bank of Canada, Bank of Montreal, Toronto-Dominion Bank, Royal Bank of Canada, Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, Scotiabank, National Bank of Canada, Laurentian Bank of Canada and Citibank Canada, plaintiffs alleges that conversion commissions made on foreign currency transactions are credit charges under the QCPA and cannot be charged prior to the 21-day grace period under the QCPA. The class includes all persons residing in Quebec holding a credit card issued by one of the defendants to whom fees were charged since April 17, 2000, for transactions made in foreign currency before expiration of the period of 21 days following the statement of account. The class claims reimbursement of all foreign currency conversions, CDN$400 per class member for trouble, inconvenience and punitive damages, interest and fees and costs. On June 11, 2009, following trial, the Superior Court rendered a judgment in favor of the plaintiffs against Amex Bank of Canada and awarded damages in the amount of approximately CDN$8.3 million plus interest on the QCPA and non-disclosure claims and punitive damages in the amount of CDN$25 per Card Member. The Court of Appeal overturned the decision against Amex Bank of Canada and certain of the other co-defendants. The remaining co-defendants and the plaintiffs appealed and that appeal was heard by the Supreme Court of Canada on February 13, 2014. On September 19, 2014, the Supreme Court of Canada denied the co-defendants appeal but granted plaintiffs appeal in part, partially restoring the trial court s award against Amex Bank of Canada as well as the punitive damages award against all defendants. °Item 1A. RISK FACTORS For a discussion of our risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013 (the Annual Report) and Part II, Item 1A. Risk Factors of our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2014 (the Second Quarter Form 10-Q). There are no material changes from the risk factors set forth in the Annual Report, as supplemented and updated in the Second Quarter Form 10-Q. However, the risks and uncertainties that we face are not limited to those set forth in the Annual Report and Second Quarter Form 10-Q. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also adversely affect our business and the trading price of our securities. 79 Table of Contents °Item 2. UNREGISTERED SALES OF EQUITY SECURITIES AND USE OF PROCEEDS The table below sets forth the information with respect to purchases of the Company s common stock made by or on behalf of the Company during the three months ended September 30, 2014. 80 Table of Contents °Item 5. OTHER INFORMATION Pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012, which added Section 13(r) to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act ), an issuer is required to disclose in its annual or quarterly reports, as applicable, whether it or any of its affiliates knowingly engaged in certain activities, transactions or dealings relating to Iran or with individuals or entities designated pursuant to certain Executive Orders. Disclosure is generally required even where the activities, transactions or dealings were conducted outside the United States by non-U.S. affiliates in compliance with applicable law, and whether or not the activities are sanctionable under U.S. law. A travel company that may be considered an affiliate of ours, American Express Nippon Travel Agency, Inc. ( Nippon Travel Agency ), has informed us that during the third quarter of 2014 it obtained 15 visas from the Iranian embassy in Japan in connection with certain travel arrangements on behalf of clients. Nippon Travel Agency had negligible gross revenues and net profits attributable to these transactions. Nippon Travel Agency has informed us that it intends to continue to engage in this activity so long as such activity is permitted under U.S. law. The list of exhibits required to be filed as exhibits to this report are listed on page E-1 hereof, under Exhibit Index which is incorporated herein by reference. 81 Table of Contents SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. 82 Table of Contents EXHIBIT INDEX The following exhibits are filed as part of this Quarterly Report: E-1 